Alaska, session 34, HB60.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 * Section 1. AS 29.71.040(a) is amended to read: 06 (a) If a municipality that receives state money seeks to purchase an 07 agricultural product and an agricultural product harvested in the state is available that 08 is of like quality compared with a similar agricultural product harvested outside the 09 state, the municipality 10 (1) shall purchase the product harvested in the state if the product is 11 priced not more than 10 [SEVEN] percent above the similar product harvested outside 12 the state; 13 (2) may purchase the product harvested in the state only if the product 14 is priced not more than 25 [15] percent above the similar product harvested outside the 01 state. 02 * Sec. 2. AS 29.71.040(b) is amended to read: 03 (b) If a municipality that receives state money seeks to purchase a fisheries 04 product and a fisheries product harvested or processed within the jurisdiction of the 05 state is available that is of like quality compared with a similar fisheries product 06 harvested or processed outside the jurisdiction of the state, the municipality 07 (1) shall purchase the product harvested or processed within the 08 jurisdiction of the state if the product is priced not more than 10 [SEVEN] percent 09 above the similar product harvested or processed outside the jurisdiction of the state; 10 (2) may purchase the product harvested or processed in the jurisdiction 11 of the state only if the product is priced not more than 25 [15] percent above the 12 product harvested or processed outside the jurisdiction of the state. 13 * Sec. 3. AS 36.15.050(a) is amended to read: 14 (a) When agricultural products are purchased by the state or by a school 15 district that receives state money, a preference not less than 10 [SEVEN] percent nor 16 more than 25 [15] percent shall be applied to the price of products harvested in the 17 state. 18 * Sec. 4. AS 36.15.050(b) is amended to read: 19 (b) When fisheries products are purchased by the state or by a school district 20 that receives state money, a preference not less than 10 [SEVEN] percent nor more 21 than 25 [15] percent shall be applied to the price of products harvested or processed 22 within the jurisdiction of the state. 23 * Sec. 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2025. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.